apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="appa/rire__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rvi</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rivate</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riste</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rivi</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>risti</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rver</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rvero</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riremmo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rve</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>iano</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>risser</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirei</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riamo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ia</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rireste</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riresti</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rirebber</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>iono</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirebbero</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rse</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirebbe</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>re</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riremo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rsi</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rsa</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rso</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rissimo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirò</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rissi</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirete</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riste</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirai</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rissi</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>riran</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riranno</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rirà</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rivamo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rimmo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rivo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rissero</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rite</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>risse</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ri</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riamo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ia</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riate</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rivan</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ia</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rivano</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rendo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riva</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ian</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>riamo</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>io</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rite</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ri</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rir</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ion</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rire</l>
	  <r>rire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="apparire"><i>appa</i><par n="appa/rire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riapparire"><i>riappa</i><par n="appa/rire__vblex"/></e>
